Washington statutes.
RCW 35.47.040

Action under RCW 35.47.010 through 35.47.030 unaffected by chapter 35.48 RCW or other law.

Nothing in chapter 35.48 RCW or other existing law to the contrary shall preclude the action authorized herein.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 6 s 4.]